Washington statutes.
RCW 18.96.010

Evidence of qualifications required.

In order to safeguard human health and property, and to promote the public welfare, any person in either public or private capacity practicing or offering to practice landscape architecture for hire shall be required to submit evidence that he or she is qualified so to practice and shall be licensed under the provisions of this chapter.

[ 2009 c 370 s 2; 1969 ex.s. c 158 s 1.]

NOTES:

Finding—2009 c 370: "The legislature finds that in order to safeguard life, health, and property and to promote public welfare, it is necessary to regulate the practice of landscape architecture, based on the first action taken to regulate the profession in 1969, and subsequent review in year 1988 along with review and revisions in 2009." [ 2009 c 370 s 1.]

Effective date—2009 c 370 ss 1-16, 18, 20, and 21: "Sections 1 through 16, 18, 20, and 21 of this act take effect July 1, 2010." [ 2009 c 370 s 24.]